Utah statutes.
34A-1-306.   Orders not to be set aside on technicalities.

A substantial compliance with the requirements of this chapter shall be sufficient to give effect to the orders of the commission, and they may not be declared inoperative, illegal, or void for any omission of a technical nature.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

